ubuntu.slaves.black/1/packages/xuxen-eu-spell/src/myspell/eu-ES.aff
SFX j Y 585
SFX j  e      ea          e
SFX j  e      eago          e
SFX j  e      eagoa          e
SFX j  e      eagoak          e
SFX j  e      eagoarekin          e
SFX j  e      eagoarendako          e
SFX j  e      eagoarentzat          e
SFX j  e      eagoaren          e
SFX j  e      eagoari          e
SFX j  e      eagoaz          e
SFX j  e      eagoei          e
SFX j  e      eagoek          e
SFX j  e      eagoekin          e
SFX j  e      eagoendako          e
SFX j  e      eagoentzat          e
SFX j  e      eagoez          e
SFX j  e      eagoen          e
SFX j  e      eagogatik          e
SFX j  e      eagooi          e
SFX j  e      eagook          e
SFX j  e      eagookin          e
SFX j  e      eagoontzat          e
SFX j  e      eagootaz          e
SFX j  e      eagooz          e
SFX j  e      eagoon          e
SFX j  e      eagotzat          e
SFX j  e      eagok          e
SFX j  e      eagoz          e
SFX j  e      eagorekin          e
SFX j  e      eagorendako          e
SFX j  e      eagorentzat          e
SFX j  e      eagoren          e
SFX j  e      eagori          e
SFX j  e      eagorik          e
SFX j  e      eagoan          e
SFX j  e      eagoko          e
SFX j  e      eagoraino          e
SFX j  e      eagorantz          e
SFX j  e      eagorat          e
SFX j  e      eagora          e
SFX j  e      eagotik          e
SFX j  e      eak          e
SFX j  e      earekin          e
SFX j  e      earekiko          e
SFX j  e      earendako          e
SFX j  e      earentzat          e
SFX j  e      earentzako          e
SFX j  e      earen          e
SFX j  e      earena          e
SFX j  e      earenak          e
SFX j  e      earenarekin          e
SFX j  e      earenarendako          e
SFX j  e      earenarentzat          e
SFX j  e      earenari          e
SFX j  e      earenaz          e
SFX j  e      earenei          e
SFX j  e      earenek          e
SFX j  e      earenekin          e
SFX j  e      earenendako          e
SFX j  e      earenentzat          e
SFX j  e      earenetaraino          e
SFX j  e      earenetarantz          e
SFX j  e      earenetarat          e
SFX j  e      earenetara          e
SFX j  e      earenetatik          e
SFX j  e      earenetan          e
SFX j  e      earenetarik          e
SFX j  e      earenez          e
SFX j  e      earengan          e
SFX j  e      earengana          e
SFX j  e      earenganaino          e
SFX j  e      earenganantz          e
SFX j  e      earengandik          e
SFX j  e      earengatik          e
SFX j  e      earenoi          e
SFX j  e      earenok          e
SFX j  e      earenokin          e
SFX j  e      earenontzat          e
SFX j  e      earenotaz          e
SFX j  e      earenoz          e
SFX j  e      eareni          e
SFX j  e      earenik          e
SFX j  e      earenean          e
SFX j  e      eareneraino          e
SFX j  e      earenerantz          e
SFX j  e      earenerat          e
SFX j  e      earenera          e
SFX j  e      earenetik          e
SFX j  e      eari          e
SFX j  e      eaz          e
SFX j  e      eagan          e
SFX j  e      eagana          e
SFX j  e      eaganaino          e
SFX j  e      eaganantz          e
SFX j  e      eagandik          e
SFX j  e      eagatik          e
SFX j  e      eegi          e
SFX j  e      eegia          e
SFX j  e      eegiak          e
SFX j  e      eegiarekin          e
SFX j  e      eegiarendako          e
SFX j  e      eegiarentzat          e
SFX j  e      eegiaren          e
SFX j  e      eegiari          e
SFX j  e      eegiaz          e
SFX j  e      eegiei          e
SFX j  e      eegiek          e
SFX j  e      eegiekin          e
SFX j  e      eegiendako          e
SFX j  e      eegientzat          e
SFX j  e      eegietako          e
SFX j  e      eegietaraino          e
SFX j  e      eegietarantz          e
SFX j  e      eegietarat          e
SFX j  e      eegietara          e
SFX j  e      eegietatik          e
SFX j  e      eegietan          e
SFX j  e      eegietarik          e
SFX j  e      eegiez          e
SFX j  e      eegien          e
SFX j  e      eegigatik          e
SFX j  e      eegioi          e
SFX j  e      eegiok          e
SFX j  e      eegiokin          e
SFX j  e      eegiontzat          e
SFX j  e      eegiotaz          e
SFX j  e      eegioz          e
SFX j  e      eegion          e
SFX j  e      eegitzat          e
SFX j  e      eegik          e
SFX j  e      eegitako          e
SFX j  e      eegitaraino          e
SFX j  e      eegitarantz          e
SFX j  e      eegitarat          e
SFX j  e      eegitara          e
SFX j  e      eegitatik          e
SFX j  e      eegitan          e
SFX j  e      eegitarik          e
SFX j  e      eegiz          e
SFX j  e      eegirekin          e
SFX j  e      eegirendako          e
SFX j  e      eegirentzat          e
SFX j  e      eegiren          e
SFX j  e      eegiri          e
SFX j  e      eegirik          e
SFX j  e      eegian          e
SFX j  e      eegiko          e
SFX j  e      eegiraino          e
SFX j  e      eegirantz          e
SFX j  e      eegirat          e
SFX j  e      eegira          e
SFX j  e      eegitik          e
SFX j  e      eei          e
SFX j  e      eek          e
SFX j  e      eekin          e
SFX j  e      eekiko          e
SFX j  e      een          e
SFX j  e      eendako          e
SFX j  e      eentzat          e
SFX j  e      eentzako          e
SFX j  e      eena          e
SFX j  e      eenak          e
SFX j  e      eenarekin          e
SFX j  e      eenarendako          e
SFX j  e      eenarentzat          e
SFX j  e      eenaren          e
SFX j  e      eenari          e
SFX j  e      eenaz          e
SFX j  e      eenei          e
SFX j  e      eenek          e
SFX j  e      eenekin          e
SFX j  e      eenendako          e
SFX j  e      eenentzat          e
SFX j  e      eenetako          e
SFX j  e      eenetaraino          e
SFX j  e      eenetarantz          e
SFX j  e      eenetarat          e
SFX j  e      eenetara          e
SFX j  e      eenetatik          e
SFX j  e      eenetan          e
SFX j  e      eenetarik          e
SFX j  e      eenez          e
SFX j  e      eenen          e
SFX j  e      eengatik          e
SFX j  e      eenoi          e
SFX j  e      eenok          e
SFX j  e      eenokin          e
SFX j  e      eenontzat          e
SFX j  e      eenotaz          e
SFX j  e      eenoz          e
SFX j  e      eenon          e
SFX j  e      eeni          e
SFX j  e      eenik          e
SFX j  e      eenean          e
SFX j  e      eeneko          e
SFX j  e      eeneraino          e
SFX j  e      eenerantz          e
SFX j  e      eenerat          e
SFX j  e      eenera          e
SFX j  e      eenetik          e
SFX j  e      eetako          e
SFX j  e      eetakoa          e
SFX j  e      eetakoago          e
SFX j  e      eetakoak          e
SFX j  e      eetakoarekin          e
SFX j  e      eetakoarendako          e
SFX j  e      eetakoarentzat          e
SFX j  e      eetakoari          e
SFX j  e      eetakoaz          e
SFX j  e      eetakoegi          e
SFX j  e      eetakoei          e
SFX j  e      eetakoek          e
SFX j  e      eetakoekin          e
SFX j  e      eetakoendako          e
SFX j  e      eetakoentzat          e
SFX j  e      eetakoetaraino          e
SFX j  e      eetakoetarantz          e
SFX j  e      eetakoetarat          e
SFX j  e      eetakoetara          e
SFX j  e      eetakoetatik          e
SFX j  e      eetakoetan          e
SFX j  e      eetakoetarik          e
SFX j  e      eetakoez          e
SFX j  e      eetakogatik          e
SFX j  e      eetakooi          e
SFX j  e      eetakook          e
SFX j  e      eetakookin          e
SFX j  e      eetakoontzat          e
SFX j  e      eetakootaz          e
SFX j  e      eetakooz          e
SFX j  e      eetakotzat          e
SFX j  e      eetakok          e
SFX j  e      eetakotaraino          e
SFX j  e      eetakotarantz          e
SFX j  e      eetakotarat          e
SFX j  e      eetakotara          e
SFX j  e      eetakotatik          e
SFX j  e      eetakotan          e
SFX j  e      eetakotarik          e
SFX j  e      eetakoz          e
SFX j  e      eetakorekin          e
SFX j  e      eetakorendako          e
SFX j  e      eetakorentzat          e
SFX j  e      eetakori          e
SFX j  e      eetakorik          e
SFX j  e      eetakoan          e
SFX j  e      eetakoraino          e
SFX j  e      eetakorantz          e
SFX j  e      eetakorat          e
SFX j  e      eetakora          e
SFX j  e      eetakotik          e
SFX j  e      eetaraino          e
SFX j  e      eetarainoko          e
SFX j  e      eetarantz          e
SFX j  e      eetarantzago          e
SFX j  e      eetarantzegi          e
SFX j  e      eetaranzko          e
SFX j  e      eetarat          e
SFX j  e      eetarako          e
SFX j  e      eetara          e
SFX j  e      eetarago          e
SFX j  e      eetatik          e
SFX j  e      eetatiko          e
SFX j  e      eetan          e
SFX j  e      eetarik          e
SFX j  e      eetariko          e
SFX j  e      eez          e
SFX j  e      eengan          e
SFX j  e      eengana          e
SFX j  e      eenganaino          e
SFX j  e      eenganantz          e
SFX j  e      eengandik          e
SFX j  e      egatik          e
SFX j  e      egatiko          e
SFX j  e      eoi          e
SFX j  e      eok          e
SFX j  e      eokin          e
SFX j  e      eokiko          e
SFX j  e      eontzat          e
SFX j  e      eontzako          e
SFX j  e      eotaz          e
SFX j  e      eotako          e
SFX j  e      eotaraino          e
SFX j  e      eotarantz          e
SFX j  e      eotarat          e
SFX j  e      eotara          e
SFX j  e      eotatik          e
SFX j  e      eotan          e
SFX j  e      eotarik          e
SFX j  e      eoz          e
SFX j  e      eon          e
SFX j  e      eona          e
SFX j  e      eonak          e
SFX j  e      eonarekin          e
SFX j  e      eonarendako          e
SFX j  e      eonarentzat          e
SFX j  e      eonari          e
SFX j  e      eonaz          e
SFX j  e      eonei          e
SFX j  e      eonek          e
SFX j  e      eonekin          e
SFX j  e      eonendako          e
SFX j  e      eonentzat          e
SFX j  e      eonez          e
SFX j  e      eongan          e
SFX j  e      eongana          e
SFX j  e      eonganaino          e
SFX j  e      eonganantz          e
SFX j  e      eongandik          e
SFX j  e      eongatik          e
SFX j  e      eonoi          e
SFX j  e      eonok          e
SFX j  e      eonokin          e
SFX j  e      eonontzat          e
SFX j  e      eonotaz          e
SFX j  e      eonoz          e
SFX j  e      eoni          e
SFX j  e      eonik          e
SFX j  e      eonean          e
SFX j  e      eoneraino          e
SFX j  e      eonerantz          e
SFX j  e      eonerat          e
SFX j  e      eonera          e
SFX j  e      eonetik          e
SFX j  e      etxo          e
SFX j  e      etxoa          e
SFX j  e      etxoago          e
SFX j  e      etxoak          e
SFX j  e      etxoarekin          e
SFX j  e      etxoarendako          e
SFX j  e      etxoarentzat          e
SFX j  e      etxoaren          e
SFX j  e      etxoari          e
SFX j  e      etxoaz          e
SFX j  e      etxoegi          e
SFX j  e      etxoei          e
SFX j  e      etxoek          e
SFX j  e      etxoekin          e
SFX j  e      etxoen          e
SFX j  e      etxoendako          e
SFX j  e      etxoentzat          e
SFX j  e      etxoez          e
SFX j  e      etxogatik          e
SFX j  e      etxooi          e
SFX j  e      etxook          e
SFX j  e      etxookin          e
SFX j  e      etxoontzat          e
SFX j  e      etxootaz          e
SFX j  e      etxooz          e
SFX j  e      etxoon          e
SFX j  e      etxotzat          e
SFX j  e      etxok          e
SFX j  e      etxoz          e
